Arkansas, session 2025, SB531.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 14, Chapter 56, Subchapter 4, is
amended to add additional sections to read as follows:
14-56-427. Agreement to comply with municipal development regulations.
(a) A municipality may enter into an agreement with a property owner
outside the boundaries of the municipality to provide one (1) or more
municipal services if the property owner agrees to adhere to any land or
development regulations intended to carry out a municipal plan under this
subchapter.
(b) The municipality does not need county approval for any planning or
development regulations to apply to an agreement authorized under this
section.
(c) An agreement under this section shall apply to any successive
*SSS248*
03/20/2025 8:08:25 AM SSS248

SB531
owners of the property.

14-56-428. Agreement to annex property at later date.
(a) A municipality may enter into an agreement with a property owner
outside the boundaries of the municipality to provide one (1) or more
municipal services if the property owner agrees to voluntarily annex into the
municipality at the time the property becomes contiguous to the municipality.
(b) If the municipal provider of services has a prerequisite that the
affected property owner annex into the municipal boundaries before providing
service, the prerequisite shall be clearly defined in an application or
agreement under subsection (a) of this section.
(c) Failure to clearly define any annexation prerequisite within the
application or agreement under subsection (b) of this section prohibits the
municipal provider of services from requiring annexation in exchange for
services for those areas without an annexation prerequisite from the affected
property owner.
(d) An agreement under this section shall apply to any successive
owners of the property.
(e) If a petition of annexation is not filed by the property owner
subject to the agreement under subsection (a) of this section within one (1)
year after the property becomes contiguous, the municipality may initiate
annexation proceedings under § 14-40-501 et seq.














03/20/2025 8:08:25 AM SSS248